North Dakota, session 69, SB2048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-59-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-59-11. Information technology plans.
Each executive branch state agency or institution, excluding the institutions under the control of the
board of higher education, unless the chief information officer grants an exemption, shall participate in
the information technology planning process based on guidelines developed by the department. The
plan must be submitted to the department by August fifteenth of each even-numbered year unless the
chief information officer grants an extension. The department shall review each entity's plan for
compliance with statewide information technology policies and standards and may require an entity to
change its plan to comply with statewide policies or standards or to resolve conflicting directions among
plans. Agencies of the judicial and legislative branches shall file their information technology plans with
the department by August fifteenth of each even-numbered year. Based on the plans, the department
shall prepare a statewide information technology plan and distribute copies of that plan to members of
the legislative assembly as requested by the legislative council. The statewide information technology
plan must be developed with emphasis on long-termagency strategic goals, business objectives, and
accomplishmentsalignment to statewide information technology initiatives.

S. B. NO. 2048 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2048.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State